Oklahoma, session 2025, SB276.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 20 O.S. 2021, Section 1224, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1224. On August 1 each year:


1. the The board of trustees of a county having a population of


less than five hundred thousand (500,000) according to the latest


Federal Decennial Census shall transmit to the Supreme Court for


deposit in the State Judicial Revolving Fund all funds on deposit in


the law library fund Law Library Fund in excess of twenty-five


percent (25%) of the income to such Fund fund during the preceding



Req. No. 481 Page 1


fiscal year, the existing surplus on hand on the effective date of


this act being excluded; and


2. The board of trustees of a county having a population of


five hundred thousand (500,000) or more according to the latest


Federal Decennial Census shall vote whether to retain all funds on


deposit in the Law Library Fund in excess of twenty-five percent


(25%) of the income to such fund during the preceding fiscal year or


authorize the same, in whole or in part, to be transmitted to the


Supreme Court for deposit in the State Judicial Revolving Fund.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 20 O.S. 2021, Section 1226, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1226. A. At the request of the board of trustees of


the law library in a county having a population of three hundred


thousand (300,000) or more, the presiding judge of an administrative


district, with the approval of the Chief Justice of the Supreme


Court, shall be authorized to transfer up to Ten Thousand Dollars


($10,000.00) per fiscal year from the court fund of the county in


which the law library is located to the Law Library Fund of that


county.


B. In counties having a population of less than three hundred


thousand (300,000) five hundred thousand (500,000), the court fund


of the county in which a law library is located shall annually


transfer to the Law Library Revolving Fund the following amounts:



Req. No. 481 Page 2


1. In counties having a population of less than ten thousand


(10,000), the sum of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00); and


2. In counties having a population of ten thousand (10,000) or


more, but less than thirty thousand (30,000), the sum of Seven


Thousand Dollars ($7,000.00); and


3. In counties having a population of thirty thousand (30,000)


or more, but less than three hundred thousand (300,000) five hundred


thousand (500,000), the sum of Nine Thousand Dollars ($9,000.00).


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 28 O.S. 2021, Section 152, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 237, O.S.L. 2022 (28 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 152), is amended to read as follows:


Section 152. A. In any civil case filed in a district court,


the court clerk shall collect, at the time of filing, the following


flat fees, none of which shall ever be refundable, and which shall


be the only charge for court costs, except as is otherwise


specifically provided for by law:


1. Actions for divorce, alimony without divorce,


separate maintenance, custody or support......................$183.00


2. Any ancillary proceeding to modify or vacate


a divorce decree providing for custody or support..............$43.00


3. Probate and guardianship..............................$135.00


4. Annual guardianship report.............................$33.00





Req. No. 481 Page 3


5. Any proceeding for sale or lease of real or


personal property or mineral interest in probate or


guardianship...................................................$43.00


6. Any proceeding to revoke the probate of a


will...........................................................$43.00


7. Judicial determination of death........................$58.00


8. Adoption..............................................$105.00


9. Civil actions for an amount of Ten Thousand


Dollars ($10,000.00) or less and condemnation.................$150.00


10. Civil actions for an amount of Ten Thousand


One Dollars ($10,001.00) or more .............................$163.00


11. Garnishment...........................................$23.00


12. Continuing wage garnishment...........................$63.00


13. Any other proceeding after judgment...................$33.00


14. All others, including but not limited to,


actions for forcible entry and detainer, judgments


from all other courts, including the Workers’


Compensation Court.............................................$85.00


15. Notice of renewal of judgment.........................$23.00


B. In addition to the amounts collected pursuant to paragraphs


1, 3, 7, 8, 9, 10, and 14 of subsection A of this section,:


1. In counties having a population of less than five hundred


thousand (500,000) according to the latest Federal Decennial Census,



Req. No. 481 Page 4


the sum of Six Dollars ($6.00) shall be assessed and credited to the


Law Library Fund; and


2. In counties having a population of five hundred thousand


(500,000) or more according to the latest Federal Decennial Census,


the sum of Twelve Dollars ($12.00) shall be assessed and credited to


the Law Library Fund pursuant to Section 1201 et seq. of Title 20 of


the Oklahoma Statutes.


C. In addition to the amounts collected pursuant to subsections


A and B of this section, the sum of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00)


shall be assessed and credited to the Oklahoma Court Information


System Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 1315 of Title 20


of the Oklahoma Statutes.


D. In addition to the amounts collected pursuant to subsection


A of this section, the sum of Five Dollars ($5.00) shall be assessed


and credited to the Oklahoma court-appointed special advocates


(OCASA).


E. In addition to the amounts collected pursuant to subsection


A of this section, the sum of Two Dollars ($2.00) shall be assessed


and credited as follows:


1. One Dollar and fifty-five cents ($1.55) of such amount shall


be credited to the Council on Judicial Complaints Revolving Fund;


and


2. Forty-five cents ($0.45) of such amount shall be credited to


the Supreme Court Revolving Fund and may be budgeted and expended by

Req. No. 481 Page 5


the Supreme Court for expenses lawfully incurred for providing


qualified courtroom interpreter services in the district courts, for


credentialing and training Oklahoma courtroom interpreters, and for


any other expenditures determined by the Supreme Court to be


necessary to provide language access in the district courts as


required by state and federal law. Payments of expenses may be made


after the claim or expense is approved by the Chief Justice of the


Supreme Court or another justice designated by the Chief Justice.


F. In addition to the amounts collected pursuant to paragraphs


1, 3, 8, 9, 10, and 14 of subsection A of this section, each county


may assess, upon approval by the board of county commissioners, a


sum not to exceed Ten Dollars ($10.00) per case to be credited to


the Sheriff’s Service Fee Account in the county in which the action


arose for the purpose of enhancing existing or providing additional


courthouse security.


G. Until November 1, 2027, in addition to the amounts collected


pursuant to subsection A of this section, the sum of Ten Dollars


($10.00) shall be assessed and credited to the Court Clerk’s Records


Management and Preservation Fund created in Section 31.3 of this


title.


H. In any case in which a litigant claims to have a just cause


of action and that, by reason of poverty, the litigant is unable to


pay the fees and costs provided for in this section and is


financially unable to employ counsel, upon the filing of an

Req. No. 481 Page 6


affidavit in forma pauperis executed before any officer authorized


by law to administer oaths to that effect and upon satisfactory


showing to the court that the litigant has no means and is,


therefore, unable to pay the applicable fees and costs and to employ


counsel, no fees or costs shall be required. The opposing party or


parties may file with the court clerk of the court having


jurisdiction of the cause an affidavit similarly executed


contradicting the allegation of poverty. In all such cases, the


court shall promptly set for hearing the determination of


eligibility to litigate without payment of fees or costs. Until a


final order is entered determining that the affiant is ineligible,


the clerk shall permit the affiant to litigate without payment of


fees or costs. Any litigant executing a false affidavit or counter


affidavit pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be guilty


of perjury.


I. Payments to the court clerk for fees and costs assessed


pursuant to this section may be made by a nationally recognized


credit or debit card or other electronic payment method as provided


in paragraph 1 of subsection B of Section 151 of this title.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-481 CC 12/30/2024 8:58:37 PM





Req. No. 481 Page 7